Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1362.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Milk Dispensary School Pilot Program Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Agriculture of the Commonwealth."Eligible school." A public school entity or a nonpublic school participating in the National School Lunch Program or School Breakfast Program within this Commonwealth."Milk dispensary system." Equipment and associated supplies 12345678910111213141516171819 used to safely store, hold, cool and dispense Grade A whole milk in compliance with applicable Federal and State food safety standards, including:(1) bulk dispensers;(2) bag in box units or sealed unit dispensers;(3) upright coolers;(4) dairy carts; and(5) any required sanitation fixtures."Pilot program." The Milk Dispensary School Pilot Program established under section 3(a)."Public school entity." A school district, intermediate unit, charter school, regional charter school or career and technical center.Section 3. Milk Dispensary School Pilot Program.(a) Establishment.--The Milk Dispensary School Pilot Program is established within the department to provide grants to eligible schools to install milk dispensary systems in accordance with this act.(b) Administration.--The department, in collaboration with the Center for Dairy Excellence, shall administer the pilot program.(c) Authority.--The department, with technical assistance from the Center for Dairy Excellence, shall:(1) solicit, review and approve applications from eligible schools to participate in the pilot program;(2) award grants for acquisition, installation and maintenance of milk dispensary systems;(3) develop program standards, guidance and training materials;(4) coordinate with the Department of Education and the 20260SB1362PN1785 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Department of Health to ensure alignment with Federal and State child nutrition and food safety requirements; and(5) collect data and evaluate outcomes in consultation with the Center for Dairy Excellence.Section 4. Pilot program duration and grants.(a) Duration.--The pilot program shall operate for a period of 10 school years beginning with the 2027-2028 school year.(b) Grants.--The department shall award grants to eligible schools in accordance with this section.(c) Diversity of grant awards.--The department shall select a diverse cohort of not fewer than 20 eligible schools:(1) representing urban, suburban and rural regions; and(2) of varying enrollment sizes.(d) Prioritization of grant awards.--In awarding grants, the department shall prioritize applicants that:(1) demonstrate potential for measurable reductions in packaging waste and product loss;(2) serve high percentages of low-income students or operate the United States Department of Agriculture Community Eligibility Provision;(3) source whole milk from locally sourced dairy processors; and(4) commit to share data and best practices with other schools.(e) Allowable costs.--Grant funds may be used:(1) to purchase or lease milk dispensary systems and required accessories;(2) for installation, calibration and maintenance costs;(3) for staff training and food safety certification; and20260SB1362PN1785 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) for measurement and reporting costs approved by the department.Section 5. Standards and compliance.(a) Food safety.--Each milk dispensary system and associated operating practices shall comply with the most current, applicable Federal regulations and State food safety standards. The department shall post technical guidance, in consultation with the Department of Health, on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.(b) Nutrition rules.--A school participating in the pilot program shall comply with all applicable Federal regulations and requirements of the National School Lunch Program and School Breakfast Program, including fluid milk requirements and meal pattern rules.(c) Procurement.--School procurement shall follow applicable Federal and State procurement requirements, including Buy American provisions where applicable. The department, in consultation with the Department of Education, shall provide model specifications.Section 6. Data collection, evaluating and reporting.(a) Metrics.--Participating schools shall submit quarterly data to the department, including:(1) milk volumes purchased and dispensed, student uptake rates, temperature logs and waste reduction metrics;(2) cost comparisons against prior packaging formats; and(3) qualitative feedback from food service staff and students.(b) Interim updates.--The department shall provide an annual public update summarizing participation, costs, preliminary 20260SB1362PN1785 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 outcomes and recommendations.(c) Report.--Within three months after the conclusion of the third year of the pilot program, the department, in collaboration with the Center for Dairy Excellence, shall submit a report to the Governor and the General Assembly detailing outcomes, cost benefit analysis, food safety findings, environmental impacts and policy recommendations, including whether to expand, modify or discontinue the pilot program.Section 7. Account and funding.(a) Creation of account.--The Milk Dispensary School Pilot Program Account is established in the State Treasury. The account shall consist of appropriations, gifts, grants and other funds received for the purposes of this act.(b) Appropriation.--Money in the account is appropriated to the department on a continuing basis for the purposes of providing grants under this act.(c) Matching funds.--The department may require participating schools to provide matching funds or in-kind contributions not to exceed 10% of the award, except for schools meeting established low-income thresholds.Section 8. Sunset.The authority for the department to provide grants under this act shall expire five years after the effective date of this section.Section 9. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20260SB1362PN1785 - 5 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526